Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-8,199
Certificate of licensure; issuance; use; new or duplicate certificate, fee.

(1) The board shall issue to any applicant who has met the requirements of the Professional Landscape Architects Act a certificate of licensure giving the licensee proper authority to carry out the prerogatives of the act. The certificate of licensure shall carry the designation Professional Landscape Architect. The certificate of licensure shall give the full name of the licensee and license number and shall be signed by two members of the board.

(2) The certificate of licensure shall be prima facie evidence that the person is entitled to all rights, privileges, and responsibilities of a professional landscape architect while the certificate of licensure remains unrevoked and unexpired.

(3) The board may issue a new certificate of licensure to replace any lost, destroyed, or mutilated certificate of licensure or issue a duplicate of any active certificate of licensure upon request from the licensee. A fee not to exceed fifty dollars, in accordance with subsection (1) of section 81-8,194, may be charged for each such issuance.

(4) Any person holding a certificate of licensure under the Professional Landscape Architects Act as of September 3, 2025, shall be deemed to be duly licensed under the Professional Landscape Architects Act until the expiration of such certificate.

Laws 1967, c. 565, § 16, p. 1864;

Laws 1984, LB 477, § 8;

Laws 2012, LB1140, § 15;

Laws 2020, LB30, § 11;

Laws 2025, LB696, § 4.